Hawaii statutes.
§263A-5 Revocation of privilege to operate
an aircraft upon refusal to submit to testing. (a) If a person under
arrest refuses to submit to a breath or blood test, none shall be given except
as provided in section 263A-9, but the law enforcement officer, as soon as
practicable, shall submit an affidavit to a district judge of the circuit in
which the arrest was made, stating:

(1) That at the time of the arrest, the law
enforcement officer had probable cause to believe the arrested person had
either been flying or was in actual physical control of an aircraft while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor;

(2) That the arrested person had been informed of the
sanctions of this section; and

(3) That the person had refused to submit to a breath
or blood test.

(b) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the
district judge shall hold a hearing as provided in section 263A-6, and shall
determine whether the statements contained in the affidavit are true. If the
district judge finds the statements contained in the affidavit are true, the
judge shall prohibit the person from operating an aircraft from a state or
private airport for a period of one year.

(c) Whenever a court penalizes a person under
this section, it shall also require that the person be referred to a substance
abuse counselor who has been certified pursuant to section 321-193 for an
assessment of the person's alcohol dependence and the need for treatment. The
counselor shall submit a report with recommendations to the court. The court
may require the person to obtain appropriate treatment. All costs for such
assessment or treatment or both shall be borne by the penalized person.

(d) The penalties provided by this section are
additional penalties and not substitutes for other penalties provided by law.
[L 1991, c 274, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next